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DTC B11 87/55 Short in P Squib (2nd step) Circuit
(to Ground)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The P squib (2nd step) circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the front passenger airbag assem-
bly.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.
For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS−3.
DTC B11 87/55 is recorded when ground short is detected in the P squib (2nd step) circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

B11 87/55
S Short in P squib (2nd step) circuit (to ground)
S P squib (2nd step) malfunction
S Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

S Front passenger airbag assembly (P squib (2nd step))
S Airbag sensor assembly
S Dash wire

HINT:
DTC B11 87/55 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag and without the side airbag
(dual stage airbag).

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI−742.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI−764).
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2 Check dash wire(P squib (2nd step) circuit).

CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and P2+ of
the dash wire connector on the front passenger airbag assem-
bly (P squib (2nd step)) side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 M� orHigher

NG Repair or replace dash wire.

OK
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3 Check airbag sensor assembly.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
(b) Using a service wire, connect P2+ and P2− of the dash

wire connector on the front passenger airbag assembly (P
squib (2nd step)) side.

(c) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for 10

seconds.
(d)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwaitat least for 10se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB 1187/55 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB 1187/55maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace airbag sensor assembly.

OK
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4 Check P squib (2nd step).

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
(b) Disconnect the negative (−) terminal cable from the bat-

tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.
(c) Connect the front passenger airbag assembly (P squib

(2nd step)) to the dash wire.
(d) Connect the negative (−) terminal cable to the battery,

and wait at least for 2 seconds.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-

conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI−432).
(c)Turn the ignitionswitch toLOCK,andwaitat least for 10

seconds.
(d)Turn the ignitionswitch toON,andwaitat least for 10se-

conds.
(e) Check the DTC (See page DI−432).
OK:

DTCB 1187/55 isnotoutput.
HINT:
Codesother thancodeB 1187/55maybeoutputat this time,but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG Replace front passenger airbag assembly
(P squib (2nd step)).

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.


